Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201854-1166
Livestock auction
markets; license personal to holder; transfer; posting; termination.

Except
as otherwise provided in this section, each market license shall be personal
to the holder and the facilities covered thereby and transferable without
a hearing. The original or
a certified copy of such license shall be posted during sale periods in a
conspicuous place on the premises where the livestock auction market is conducted. The
market license covering any livestock auction market which does not hold a
sale for a period of one year shall terminate automatically one year from
the date of the last sale conducted by the livestock auction market, and the license holder whose
license is so terminated may request a hearing by filing a written request
for such hearing within twenty days after the termination of the license.

Laws 1963, c. 319, § 10, p. 966;

Laws 1985, LB 97, § 2;

Laws 2014, LB884, § 26.